Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.525

Conditional and special use permit applications by parties licensed or certified by the department of social and health services or the department of corrections—Mediation prior to appeal required.

A final decision by a hearing examiner involving a conditional or special use permit application under a home rule charter that is requested by a party that is licensed or certified by the department of social and health services or the department of corrections is subject to mediation under RCW 35.63.260 before an appeal may be filed.

[ 1998 c 119 s 5.]